Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-931
Graduate degree programs, defined.

Graduate degree programs shall mean those programs for which the following degrees are awarded:

(1) First professional degree being the first earned degree in the following fields: (a) Dentistry; (b) medicine, general; (c) optometry; (d) osteopathic medicine; (e) pharmacy; (f) podiatry; (g) veterinary medicine; (h) chiropractic; (i) law, general; (j) theology, general; and (k) architecture, general;

(2) Master's degree being the earned degree carrying the title Master. The master's degree is the first advanced graduate degree conferred in professional programs and general academic and occupational programs.

Master's degree professional programs include but are not limited to: (a) Engineering; (b) education; (c) allied health professions; (d) nursing; (e) architecture, specialties; (f) community and regional planning; (g) dentistry; (h) medicine, specialties; (i) optometry; (j) osteopathic medicine; (k) pharmacy; (l) podiatry; (m) social work; (n) veterinary medicine; (o) chiropractic; (p) law, specialties; and (q) theology, specialties.

Master's degree programs in general academic and occupational areas include but are not limited to: (a) Mathematics; (b) languages; (c) biological and physical sciences; (d) letters; (e) fine arts; (f) social sciences; (g) agriculture and natural resources; (h) communications; (i) business and management; (j) computer and information sciences; (k) home economics; and (l) fine and applied arts; and

(3) Doctoral degree being an earned academic degree conveying the title of Doctor. Doctoral degrees include but are not limited to: Doctor of Philosophy; Doctor of Education; and Doctor of Arts.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 7.